sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till borrmaskiner och skruvdragare > Borrchuck: Chuckar med nycklar; Chuckar utan nycklar
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Gręžtuvų ir atsuktuvų priedai > Gręžtuvų galvutės: Galvutės su raktais; Galvutės be raktų
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Fúró és csavarhúzó kiegészítők > Fúrótokmányok: Kulcsos tokmányok; Kulcs nélküli tokmányok
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør for driller og skrutrekkere > Drillchucks: Chucks med nøkkel; Nøkkelfrie chucks
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 드릴/스크루드라이버 부대용품 > 드릴 척: 키 척; 키리스 척
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 钻孔机/螺丝刀配件 > 钻夹头: 键控夹头; 无钥匙夹头
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ τρυπανιών & κατσαβιδιών > Σφικτήρες τρυπανιού: Σφικτήρες με κλειδί; Σφικτήρες χωρίς κλειδί
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para furadeiras > Mandris para furadeiras: Mandris com chave; Mandris sem chave
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для дрелей и шуруповертов > Патроны для крепления сверл: Патроны с ключом; Патроны без ключа
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Bor – tilbehør > Borepatron: Patroner med nøgle; Patroner uden nøgle
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do wiercenia > Głowice do wiertarek: Głowice kluczykowe; Głowice bezkluczykowe
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Drill & Screwdriver Accessories > Drill Chucks: Keyed Chucks; Keyless Chucks
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Matkap ve Tornavide Aksesuarları > Matkap Bağlama Aynaları: Anahtarlı Aynalar; Anahtarsız Aynalar
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per trapani e cacciavite > Mandrini: Mandrini con chiave; Mandrini senza chiave
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện máy khoan và tua vít > Đầu kẹp mũi khoan: Đầu kẹp có khóa; Đầu kẹp không có khóa
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru burghie și șurubelnițe > Mandrine de găurit: Mandrine cu cheie; Mandrine fără cheie
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за бормашини и винтоверти > Патронници за бормашина: Патронници с ключ; Безключови патронници
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství k vrtačkám > Sklíčidla pro vrtačky: Klíčová sklíčidla; Bezklíčová sklíčidla
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสว่านและไขควง > หัวจับดอกสว่าน: หัวจับแบบมีดอกจำปา; หัวจับแบบไม่มีดอกจำปา
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Poran ja ruuvinvääntimen lisätarvikkeet > Poraistukat: Kiristysholkilliset istukat; Kiristysholkittomat istukat
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Bohrzubehör > Bohrfutter: Spannfutter mit Schlüssel; Schnellspannfutter
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za bušilice i odvijače > Stezne glave za bušilice: Klasične stezne glave; Samostezne stezne glave
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za vrtalnike in vijačnike > Vpenjalne glave za vrtalnike: Vpenjalne glave s ključem; Vpenjalne glave brez ključa
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour perceuses et visseuses > Mandrins: Mandrins à clé; Mandrins sans clé
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de berbequim e chave de fendas > Mandris de berbequim: Mandris com chave; Mandris sem chave
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > ドリル関連用品 > ドリルチャック: キー付きチャック; キーレスチャック
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 電鑽/電動起子配件 > 電鑽夾頭: 嵌入式電鑽夾頭; 無鍵式電鑽夾頭
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para taladros y destornilladores > Portabrocas: Portabrocas con llave; Portabrocas sin llave
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Booraccessoires > Boorhouders: Houders met sleutel; Houders zonder sleutel
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo k vŕtačkám a skrutkovačom > Vŕtacie skľučovadlá: Skľučovadlá s ozubeným vencom; Skľučovadlá bez ozubeného venca